Washington statutes.
RCW 11.56.045

Order directing lease.

If the court should determine that it is necessary or proper, for any of the said purposes to lease any or all of said property, it may make an order directing the personal representative to lease such thereof as it may determine upon, and such order shall contain the terms and conditions of such transaction and authorize the personal representative to execute the lease and thereafter it shall be the duty of the personal representative to comply with such order. The personal representative shall not execute such lease until he or she has first presented the same to the court and obtained its approval of the form.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2045; 1965 c 145 s 11.56.045.]